Utah statutes.
36-11-201.3.   Expenditure reporting schedules.
The schedules in this section shall be used to report expenditures made to
benefit a public official as required by Section 36-11-201.
(1)  Schedule A:
(a)  the date and purpose of the expenditure;
(b)  the location of the expenditure;
(c)  the name of the public official benefitted by the expenditure;
(d)  the public official type of the public official; and
(e)  the total monetary worth of the benefit that the expenditure conferred on
the public official; and
(2)  Schedule B:
(a)  the date and purpose of the expenditure;
(b)  the public official type of the public official benefitted by the
expenditure; and
(c)  the total monetary worth of the benefit that the expenditure conferred on
the public official.
